searchsrv/searchengine/oss/sb/snowball/algorithms/turkish/stem_Unicode.sbl
/*

Copyright (c) 2001, Dr Martin Porter
Copyright (c) 2002, Richard Boulton
All rights reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with 
or without modification, are permitted provided that the 
following conditions are met:

*	Redistributions of source code must retain the 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and 
	the following disclaimer. 
*	Redistributions in binary form must reproduce 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and
 	the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or 
	other materials provided with the distribution. 
*	Neither the name of the <ORGANIZATION> nor the 
	names of its contributors may be used to endorse or 
	promote products derived from this software without
	specific rior written permission. 

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND 
CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, 
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF 
MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE 
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR 
CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, 
SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, 
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR 
SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS 
INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, 
WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING 
NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE 
OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH 
DAMAGE.

*/

/* Stemmer for Turkish
	* author: Evren (Kapusuz) Çilden
	* email: evren.kapusuz at gmail.com
	* version: 1.0 (15.01.2007)
	

	* stems nominal verb suffixes
	* stems nominal inflections
	* more than one syllable word check
	* (y,n,s,U) context check
	* vowel harmony check
	* last consonent check and conversion (b, c, d, ğ to p, ç, t, k)
	
	* The stemming algorithm is based on the paper "An Affix Stripping
	* Morphological Analyzer for Turkish" by Gülşen Eryiğit and
	* Eşref Adalı (Proceedings of the IAESTED International Conference
	* ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND APPLICATIONS, February 16-18,2004,
	* Innsbruck, Austria
	
	* Turkish is an agglutinative language and has a very rich morphological
	* structure. In Turkish, you can form many different words from a single stem
	* by appending a sequence of suffixes. Eg. The word "doktoruymuşsunuz" means
	* "You had been the doctor of him". The stem of the word is "doktor" and it
	* takes three different suffixes -sU, -ymUs, and -sUnUz. The rules about
	* the append order of suffixes can be clearly described as FSMs.
	* The paper referenced above defines some FSMs for right to left
	* morphological analysis. I generated a method for constructing snowball
	* expressions from right to left FSMs for stemming suffixes.
*/

routines (
	append_U_to_stems_ending_with_d_or_g // for preventing some overstemmings
	check_vowel_harmony	// tests vowel harmony for suffixes
	is_reserved_word	// tests whether current string is a reserved word ('ad','soyad')
	mark_cAsInA		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_DA			// noun suffix
	mark_DAn		// noun suffix
	mark_DUr		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_ki			// noun suffix
	mark_lAr		// noun suffix, nominal verb suffix
	mark_lArI		// noun suffix
	mark_nA			// noun suffix
	mark_ncA		// noun suffix
	mark_ndA		// noun suffix
	mark_ndAn		// noun suffix
	mark_nU			// noun suffix
	mark_nUn		// noun suffix
	mark_nUz		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_sU			// noun suffix
	mark_sUn		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_sUnUz		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_possessives	// -(U)m,-(U)n,-(U)mUz,-(U)nUz,
	mark_yA			// noun suffix
	mark_ylA		// noun suffix
	mark_yU			// noun suffix
	mark_yUm		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_yUz		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_yDU		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_yken		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_ymUs_		// nominal verb suffix
	mark_ysA		// nominal verb suffix
	
	mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant
	mark_suffix_with_optional_U_vowel
	mark_suffix_with_optional_n_consonant
	mark_suffix_with_optional_s_consonant
	
	more_than_one_syllable_word
	
	post_process_last_consonants
	postlude

	stem_nominal_verb_suffixes
	stem_noun_suffixes
	stem_suffix_chain_before_ki
)

/* Special characters in Unicode Latin-1 and Latin Extended-A */
stringdef c.   	hex 'E7'	// LATIN SMALL LETTER C WITH CEDILLA
stringdef g~   	hex '011F'	// LATIN SMALL LETTER G WITH BREVE
stringdef i'   	hex '0131'	// LATIN SMALL LETTER I WITHOUT DOT
stringdef o"  	hex 'F6'	// LATIN SMALL LETTER O WITH DIAERESIS
stringdef s.	hex '015F'	// LATIN SMALL LETTER S WITH CEDILLA
stringdef u"  	hex 'FC'	// LATIN SMALL LETTER U WITH DIAERESIS

stringescapes 	{ }

integers 	( strlen )	// length of a string

booleans	( continue_stemming_noun_suffixes )

groupings 	( vowel U vowel1 vowel2 vowel3 vowel4 vowel5 vowel6)

define vowel 	'ae{i'}io{o"}u{u"}'
define U	'{i'}iu{u"}'

// the vowel grouping definitions below are used for checking vowel harmony
define vowel1  	'a{i'}ou' 		// vowels that can end with suffixes containing 'a'
define vowel2  	'ei{o"}{u"}' 		// vowels that can end with suffixes containing 'e'
define vowel3  	'a{i'}' 		// vowels that can end with suffixes containing 'i''
define vowel4  	'ei'	 		// vowels that can end with suffixes containing 'i'
define vowel5  	'ou'	 		// vowels that can end with suffixes containing 'o' or 'u'
define vowel6  	'{o"}{u"}' 		// vowels that can end with suffixes containing 'o"' or 'u"'

externals 	( stem )

backwardmode (
	// checks vowel harmony for possible suffixes,
	// helps to detect whether the candidate for suffix applies to vowel harmony
	// this rule is added to prevent over stemming
	define check_vowel_harmony as (
		test
		(
			(goto vowel)   // if there is a vowel
			(
				('a' goto vowel1) or
				('e' goto vowel2) or
				('{i'}' goto vowel3) or
				('i' goto vowel4) or
				('o' goto vowel5) or
				('{o"}' goto vowel6) or
				('u' goto vowel5) or
				('{u"}' goto vowel6)
			)
		)
	)
	
	// if the last consonant before suffix is vowel and n then advance and delete
	// if the last consonant before suffix is non vowel and n do nothing
	// if the last consonant before suffix is not n then only delete the suffix
	// assumption: slice beginning is set correctly
	define mark_suffix_with_optional_n_consonant as (
		((test 'n') next (test vowel))
		or
		((not(test 'n')) test(next (test vowel)))

	)
	
	// if the last consonant before suffix is vowel and s then advance and delete
	// if the last consonant before suffix is non vowel and s do nothing
	// if the last consonant before suffix is not s then only delete the suffix
	// assumption: slice beginning is set correctly
	define mark_suffix_with_optional_s_consonant as (
		((test 's') next (test vowel))
		or
		((not(test 's')) test(next (test vowel)))
	)
	
	// if the last consonant before suffix is vowel and y then advance and delete
	// if the last consonant before suffix is non vowel and y do nothing
	// if the last consonant before suffix is not y then only delete the suffix
	// assumption: slice beginning is set correctly
	define mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant as (
		((test 'y') next (test vowel))
		or
		((not(test 'y')) test(next (test vowel)))
	)
	
	define mark_suffix_with_optional_U_vowel as (
		((test U) next (test non-vowel))
		or
		((not(test U)) test(next (test non-vowel)))

	)
	
	define mark_possessives as (
		among ('m{i'}z' 'miz' 'muz' 'm{u"}z'
		       'n{i'}z' 'niz' 'nuz' 'n{u"}z' 'm' 'n')
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_U_vowel)
	)
	
	define mark_sU as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		U
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_s_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_lArI as (
		among ('leri' 'lar{i'}')
	)
	
	define mark_yU as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		U
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)	
	)
	
	define mark_nU as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('n{i'}' 'ni' 'nu' 'n{u"}')	
	)
	
	define mark_nUn as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('{i'}n' 'in' 'un' '{u"}n')	
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_n_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_yA as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among('a' 'e')
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_nA as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among('na' 'ne')
	)
	
	define mark_DA as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among('da' 'de' 'ta' 'te')
	)
	
	define mark_ndA as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among('nda' 'nde')
	)
	
	define mark_DAn as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among('dan' 'den' 'tan' 'ten')
	)
	
	define mark_ndAn as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among('ndan' 'nden')
	)
	
	define mark_ylA as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among('la' 'le')
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_ki as (
		'ki'
	)
	
	define mark_ncA as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among('ca' 'ce')	
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_n_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_yUm as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('{i'}m' 'im' 'um' '{u"}m')
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_sUn as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('s{i'}n' 'sin' 'sun' 's{u"}n' )
	)
	
	define mark_yUz as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('{i'}z' 'iz' 'uz' '{u"}z')
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_sUnUz as (
		among ('s{i'}n{i'}z' 'siniz' 'sunuz' 's{u"}n{u"}z')
	)
	
	define mark_lAr as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('ler' 'lar')
	)
	
	define mark_nUz as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('n{i'}z' 'niz' 'nuz' 'n{u"}z')
	)
	
	define mark_DUr as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('t{i'}r' 'tir' 'tur' 't{u"}r' 'd{i'}r' 'dir' 'dur' 'd{u"}r')
	)
	
	define mark_cAsInA as (
		among ('cas{i'}na' 'cesine')
	)
	
	define mark_yDU as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('t{i'}m' 'tim' 'tum' 't{u"}m' 'd{i'}m' 'dim' 'dum' 'd{u"}m'
			't{i'}n' 'tin' 'tun' 't{u"}n' 'd{i'}n' 'din' 'dun' 'd{u"}n'
			't{i'}k' 'tik' 'tuk' 't{u"}k' 'd{i'}k' 'dik' 'duk' 'd{u"}k'
			't{i'}' 'ti' 'tu' 't{u"}' 'd{i'}' 'di' 'du' 'd{u"}')
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)
	)
